Arkansas, session 2025, HB1981.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-11-1002(4), as enacted by Acts 2025, No.
155, § 1, concerning the definition of "outdoor recreation operator" under
the law related to recreational tramways, is amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) "Outdoor recreation operator" means the owner or operator
of an outdoor recreation area, including an agency of the state or a
political subdivision of the state, or the employees, agents, officers, or
delegated representatives of the owner or operator of the outdoor recreation
area.
(B) "Outdoor recreation operator" does not include a
political subdivision of the state;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-11-1002(7), as enacted by Acts 2025, No.
155, § 1, concerning the definition of "tramway operator" under the law
*CRH327*
04/03/2025 8:31:37 AM CRH327

HB1981
related to recreational tramways, is amended to read as follows:
(7)(A) "Tramway operator" means a person, including an agency of
the state or a political subdivision of the state, who owns or controls the
operation of a recreational tramway.
(B) "Tramway operator" does not include a political
subdivision of the state.






























04/03/2025 8:31:37 AM CRH327